src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/N-A-isttoana_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - isttoana - ok : # -m animate noun, knife AEW NA1
     isttoana+NA+Sg: isttoana
     isttoana+NA+Pl: isttoaiksi
     isttoana+NA+Obv: isttoani
     isttoana+NA+Non: isttoai
     
     isttoana+NA+Px1Sg+Sg: [ nottoana, nottoama ]
     isttoana+NA+Px1Sg+Pl: [ nottoaiksi, nottoamiksi ]
     isttoana+NA+Px1Sg+Obv: [ nottoani, nottoami ]
     isttoana+NA+Px1Sg+Non: [ nottoai, nottoami ]

     isttoana+NA+Px1Pl+Sg: [ nottoannaana, nottoaminnaana ]
     isttoana+NA+Px1Pl+Pl: [ nottoannaaniksi, nottoaminnaaniksi ]
     isttoana+NA+Px1Pl+Obv: [ nottoannaani, nottoaminnaani ]
     isttoana+NA+Px1Pl+Non: [ nottoannaani, nottoaminnaani ]

     isttoana+NA+Px21Pl+Sg: [ kottoannoona, kottoaminnoona ]
     isttoana+NA+Px21Pl+Pl: [ kottoannooniksi, kottoaminnooniksi ]
     isttoana+NA+Px21Pl+Obv: [ kottoannooni, kottoaminnooni ]
     isttoana+NA+Px21Pl+Non: [ kottoannooni, kottoaminnooni ]

     isttoana+NA+Px2Sg+Sg: [ kottoana, kottoama ]
     isttoana+NA+Px2Sg+Pl: [ kottoaiksi, kottoamiksi ]
     isttoana+NA+Px2Sg+Obv: [ kottoani, kottoami ]
     isttoana+NA+Px2Sg+Non: [ kottoai, kottoami ]

     isttoana+NA+Px2Pl+Sg: [ kottoawaawa, kottoamoaawa ]
     isttoana+NA+Px2Pl+Pl: [ kottoawaawaiksi, kottoamoaawaiksi ]
     isttoana+NA+Px2Pl+Obv: [ kottoawaawayi, kottoamoaawayi ]
     isttoana+NA+Px2Pl+Non: [ kottoawaawai, kottoamoaawai ]

     isttoana+NA+Px3Sg+Pl: [ ottoaiksi, ottoamiksi ]
     isttoana+NA+Px3Sg+Obv: [ ottoani, ottoami ]
     isttoana+NA+Px3Sg+Non: [ ottoai, ottoami ]

     isttoana+NA+Px3Pl+Pl: [ ottoawaawaiksi, ottoamoaawaiksi ]
     isttoana+NA+Px3Pl+Obv: [ ottoawaawayi, ottoamoaawayi ]
     isttoana+NA+Px3Pl+Non: [ ottoawaawai, ottoamoaawai ]

     PS/ohpok+isttoana+NA+Pl: [ poksisttoaiksi, ohpoksisttoaiksi ]
